Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2446
Subsidiary of an issuing public corporation, defined.

Subsidiary of an issuing public corporation shall mean any other corporation of which voting stock having a majority of the votes entitled to be cast is owned, directly or indirectly, by such issuing public corporation.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 16.